Illinois, session 104th, HB4935.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 10-1-7.1 and 10-2.1-6.3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7.1)7    Sec. 10-1-7.1. Original appointments; full-time fire 8department.9    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 10the provisions of Section 10-1-7.2, this Section shall apply 11to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 12department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 13be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 14years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 1597-251).16    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 17to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 18department to which this Section applies shall be administered 19in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 20Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 21adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 22initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 23continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this   HB4935- 2 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 2and any other law, this Section shall control.3    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 4administer its fire department process for original 5appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 6Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 7Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 8concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 9functions exercised by the State.10    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 11consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 12fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 13Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 14Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 16(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 17than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 18    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 19to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 20eligibles established in accordance with the processes 21established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 22the performance standards required by this Section shall be 23placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 24an affected fire department.25    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 26a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a   HB4935- 3 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 2position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 3death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 4any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 5that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 6eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 7conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 8minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 9authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 10the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 11the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 12either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 13register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 14highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 15of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 16eligibles is less than 5 people.17    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 18losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 19candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 20by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 21not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 22future examinations, including an examination held during the 23time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 24eligibles.25    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 26shall be vested in the Civil Service Commission. All   HB4935- 4 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1certificates of appointment issued to any officer or member of 2an affected department shall be signed by the chairperson and 3secretary, respectively, of the commission upon appointment of 4such officer or member to the affected department by the 5commission. After being selected from the register of 6eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected department, each 7appointee shall be presented with his or her certificate of 8appointment on the day on which he or she is sworn in as a 9classified member of the affected department. Firefighters who 10were not issued a certificate of appointment when originally 11appointed shall be provided with a certificate within 10 days 12after making a written request to the chairperson of the Civil 13Service Commission. Each person who accepts a certificate of 14appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 15period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular 16member of the fire department.17    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 18person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 19effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 20department or fire protection district or employed by a State 21university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 22duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 23persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 24reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 25firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 26employees of a fire department or fire protection district who   HB4935- 5 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 2elected officials.3    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 4The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 5identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 6aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 7of members of the fire department in order to provide the 8highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 9applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 10department shall be subject to examination and testing which 11shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 12unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 13residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 14municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 15testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 16Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 17and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 18Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 19service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 20in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 21municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 22application process.23    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 24enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 25restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 26service for that municipality, or be made a condition of   HB4935- 6 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 2for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 3of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 4the Fire Department Promotion Act.5    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 6to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 7the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 8in the regularly constituted fire department of the 9municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age 10limitation does not apply to:11        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 12    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 13    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 14    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 15    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 16    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 17    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 18    protection district,19        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 20    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 21    firefighter, or22        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 23    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 24    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 25    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 26    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the   HB4935- 7 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 2    No person who is under 21 years of age shall be eligible 3for employment as a firefighter.4    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 5political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 6examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 7municipality or their designees and agents.8    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 9appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 10period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 11which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 12leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 13days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 14Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 15extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 16employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 17sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 18hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 19licensure.20    In the event that any applicant who has been found 21eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 22the final eligibility register provided for in this Division 1 23has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 24year after the date of his or her physical ability 25examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 26be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or   HB4935- 8 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 2physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 3than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 4commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 5applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 6candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 7certification and appointment that applicant may be again 8examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 9ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 10standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 11shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 12removed from the register.13    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 14the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 15subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 16given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 17preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 18published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 19therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 20circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 21municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 22examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.23    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 24firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 25ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 26aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall   HB4935- 9 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 2the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 3include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 4determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 5be made available to the public.6    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 7least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 8education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 9Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 10upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 11in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 12capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 13performed by members of a fire department. Written 14examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 15the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.16    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 17undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 18the essential functions included in the duties they may be 19called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 20the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 21are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 22called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 23frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 24department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 25in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 26for testing. These physical examinations shall be open,   HB4935- 10 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 2each applicant's physical abilities in the following 3dimensions:4        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 5    that may be required in the performance of duties 6    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 7    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 8    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 9    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 10    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 11    local appointing authority.12        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 13    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 14    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 15    environments.16        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 17    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 18    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 19    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 20    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.21    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 22capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 23industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 24approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 25of the State Fire Marshal.26    Physical ability examinations administered under this   HB4935- 11 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 2proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 3reasonable regulations of the commission.4    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 5authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 6person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 7passage of the written examination or the passage of the 8written examination and the physical ability component. 9Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 10score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 11the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 12perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 13set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 14validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 15and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 16physical ability component and any subjective components 17subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 18register.19    The examination components for an initial eligibility 20register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 21position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 22the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 23successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 24the person's results on any subjective component as described 25in subsection (d). 26    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility   HB4935- 12 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 2before any applicable preference points or subjective points 3are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 4commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 5score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 6register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 7score set by the commission.8    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 9persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 10for passage and who have passed the physical ability 11examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 12as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 13on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 14aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 15the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 16than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 17list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 18the final grades of the candidates without reference to 19priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 20preference credit.21    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 22without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 23register is established and before it expires with the 24candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 25examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 26initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission   HB4935- 13 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 2to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 3preference credit.4    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:5        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 6    the military service of the United States for a period of 7    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 8    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 9    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 10    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 11    employment with the fire department of an affected 12    department.13        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 14    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 15    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 16    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 17    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 18    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 19    employment with the fire department.20        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 21    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 22    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 23    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 24    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 25    the fire department.26        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a   HB4935- 14 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 2    and employment with the fire department of an affected 3    department providing emergency medical services.4        (5) Experience preference. All persons (A) who are or 5    have been employed by a municipality in who have been 6    paid-on-call or part-time certified Firefighter II or , 7    certified Firefighter III positions, (B) who are or have 8    been employed by a municipality in EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 9    paramedic positions while licensed by the State of 10    Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 11    paramedic, (C) who serve or have served a municipality as 12    regularly enrolled volunteer firefighters, (D) who work or 13    have worked in industries with applicable skills, as 14    approved by the commission, or (E) who have served in any 15    combination of the those capacities described in this 16    paragraph (5) may be awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. 17    However, the applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 18    points for each complete year of paid-on-call or part-time 19    service. Applicants from outside the municipality who were 20    employed as full-time firefighters or 21    firefighter-paramedics by a fire protection district or 22    another municipality may be awarded up to 5 experience 23    preference points. However, the applicant may not be 24    awarded more than one point for each complete year of 25    full-time service.26        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of   HB4935- 15 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 2    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 3    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 4    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 5    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 6    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 7    receive the full amount of preference points under this 8    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 9    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 10    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 11    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 12    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 13    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 14    based on the totals received if all points under this 15    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 16    list shall be determined by lot. 17        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 18    residence is located within the fire department's 19    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 20    employment with the fire department.21        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 22    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 23    based on an applicant's experience or background as 24    identified by the commission.25        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 26    performed fire suppression service for a department as a   HB4935- 16 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 2    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 3    specified in this Section may be awarded up to 20 4    preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 5    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 6    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 7    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 8    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 9    10-1-14 of this Division and the terms established by a 10    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 11    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 12    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 13    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 14    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 15    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 16    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 17    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 18    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 19    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 20    components of the examination. 21        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 22    preference for original appointment to persons designated 23    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 24    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 25    commission may give preference for original appointment to 26    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final   HB4935- 17 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 2    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 3    commission shall determine the number of preference points 4    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 5    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 6    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 7    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 8    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 9    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 10    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 11    preference for original appointment to persons designated 12    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 13    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 14    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 15    applied by the commission in determining the final 16    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 17    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 18    total number of preference points awarded under this 19    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 20    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 21    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 22    addition to other preference points awarded by the 23    commission. 24    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 25claim the credit before any examination held under the 26provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given   HB4935- 18 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 2list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 3credit before any certification or appointments are made from 4the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 5evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 6who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 7writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 8eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final 9eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 10of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 11credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 12eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 13upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 14the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 15eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 16employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 17background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 18history, employment history, moral character, oral 19examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 20on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 21examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 22after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.23    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 24age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 25shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 26abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period   HB4935- 19 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 2shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 3provided in this Section.4    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 5for original appointment after the names have been on the list 6for more than 2 years.7    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 8fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 9not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 10convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 11However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 12the fire department because of the person's record of 13misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1411-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1512-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1631-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 17(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 18Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 19for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 20is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 21violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 22provided.23    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 24is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 25fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 26furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal   HB4935- 20 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1Bureau of Investigation by the commission.2    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 3consider some aspect of criminal history record information 4for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 5responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 6conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 7Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 8Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 9pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 10in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.11    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 12of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 13prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 14commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 15only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 16of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 17appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 18any calendar year.19    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 20questions or answers before a written examination, or 21otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 22this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 23subject to charges for official misconduct.24    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 25in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 26examination or discharged from the position to which he or she   HB4935- 21 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 2disciplinary actions.3(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 4102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 55-13-22.) 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6.3)7    Sec. 10-2.1-6.3. Original appointments; full-time fire 8department.9    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 10the provisions of Section 10-2.1-6.4, this Section shall apply 11to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 12department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 13be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 14years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 1597-251).16    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 17to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 18department to which this Section applies shall be administered 19in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 20Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 21adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 22initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 23continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 24Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 25and any other law, this Section shall control.  HB4935- 22 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 2administer its fire department process for original 3appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 4Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 5Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 6concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 7functions exercised by the State.8    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 9consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 10fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 11Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 12Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 14(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 15than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 16    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 17to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 18eligibles established in accordance with the processes 19established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 20the performance standards required by this Section shall be 21placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 22an affected fire department.23    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 24a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 25firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 26position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion,   HB4935- 23 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 2any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 3that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 4eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 5conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 6minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 7authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 8the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 9the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 10either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 11register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 12highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 13of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 14eligibles is less than 5 people.15    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 16losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 17candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 18by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 19not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 20future examinations, including an examination held during the 21time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 22eligibles.23    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 24shall be vested in the board of fire and police commissioners. 25All certificates of appointment issued to any officer or 26member of an affected department shall be signed by the   HB4935- 24 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the board upon 2appointment of such officer or member to the affected 3department by action of the board. After being selected from 4the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected 5department, each appointee shall be presented with his or her 6certificate of appointment on the day on which he or she is 7sworn in as a classified member of the affected department. 8Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of appointment 9when originally appointed shall be provided with a certificate 10within 10 days after making a written request to the 11chairperson of the board of fire and police commissioners. 12Each person who accepts a certificate of appointment and 13successfully completes his or her probationary period shall be 14enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular member of the fire 15department.16    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 17person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 18effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 19department or fire protection district or employed by a State 20university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 21duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 22persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 23reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 24firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 25employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 26are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and   HB4935- 25 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1elected officials.2    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 3The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 4identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 5aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 6of members of the fire department in order to provide the 7highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 8applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 9department shall be subject to examination and testing which 10shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 11unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 12residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 13municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 14testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 15Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 16and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 17Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 18service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 19in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 20municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 21application process.22    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 23enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 24restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 25service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 26promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and   HB4935- 26 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 2of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 3the Fire Department Promotion Act.4    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 5to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 6the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 7in the regularly constituted fire department of the 8municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age 9limitation does not apply to:10        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 11    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 12    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 13    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 14    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 15    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 16    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 17    protection district,18        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 19    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 20    firefighter, or21        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 22    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 23    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 24    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 25    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the 26    military, and is currently under the age of 40.   HB4935- 27 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    No person who is under 21 years of age shall be eligible 2for employment as a firefighter.3    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 4political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 5examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 6municipality or their designees and agents.7    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 8appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 9period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 10which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 11leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 12days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 13Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 14extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 15employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 16sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 17hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 18licensure.19    In the event that any applicant who has been found 20eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 21the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 22has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 23year after the date of his or her physical ability 24examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 25be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 26her appointment. If, after the second examination, the   HB4935- 28 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 2than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 3commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 4applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 5candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 6certification and appointment that applicant may be again 7examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 8ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 9standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 10shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 11removed from the register.12    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 13the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 14subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 15given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 16preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 17published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 18therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 19circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 20municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 21examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.22    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 23firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 24ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 25aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 26determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on   HB4935- 29 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 2include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 3determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 4be made available to the public.5    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 6least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 7education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 8Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 9upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 10in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 11capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 12performed by members of a fire department. Written 13examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 14the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.15    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 16undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 17the essential functions included in the duties they may be 18called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 19the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 20are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 21called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 22frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 23department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 24in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 25for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 26competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test   HB4935- 30 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1each applicant's physical abilities in the following 2dimensions:3        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 4    that may be required in the performance of duties 5    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 6    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 7    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 8    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 9    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 10    local appointing authority.11        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 12    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 13    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 14    environments.15        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 16    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 17    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 18    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 19    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.20    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 21capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 22industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 23approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 24of the State Fire Marshal. 25    Physical ability examinations administered under this 26Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of   HB4935- 31 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 2reasonable regulations of the commission.3    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 4authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 5person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 6passage of the written examination or the passage of the 7written examination and the physical ability component. 8Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 9score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 10the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 11perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 12set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 13validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 14and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 15physical ability component and any subjective components 16subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 17register.18    The examination components for an initial eligibility 19register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 20position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 21the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 22successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 23the person's results on any subjective component as described 24in subsection (d). 25    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 26register, an applicant's score on the written examination,   HB4935- 32 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1before any applicable preference points or subjective points 2are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score as set by 3the commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe 4the score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 5register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 6score set by the commission.7    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 8persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 9for passage and who have passed the physical ability 10examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 11as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 12on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 13aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 14the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 15than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 16list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 17the final grades of the candidates without reference to 18priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 19preference credit.20    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 21without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 22register is established and before it expires with the 23candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 24examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 25initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 26showing the final grades of the candidates without reference   HB4935- 33 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 2preference credit.3    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:4        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 5    the military service of the United States for a period of 6    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 7    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 8    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 9    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 10    employment with the fire department of an affected 11    department.12        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 13    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 14    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 15    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 16    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 17    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 18    employment with the fire department.19        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 20    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 21    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 22    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 23    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 24    the fire department.25        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 26    license as a paramedic shall be preferred for appointment   HB4935- 34 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    to and employment with the fire department of an affected 2    department providing emergency medical services.3        (5) Experience preference. All persons (A) who are or 4    have been employed by a municipality in who have been 5    paid-on-call or part-time certified Firefighter II 6    positions, (B) who are or have been employed by a 7    municipality in EMT, EMT-I, or A-EMT positions while 8    licensed by the State of Illinois or nationally licensed 9    EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, (C) who serve or have served a 10    municipality as regularly enrolled volunteer firefighters, 11    (D) who work or have worked in industries with applicable 12    skills, as approved by the commission, or (E) who have 13    served in any combination of the those capacities 14    described in this paragraph (5) shall be awarded 0.5 point 15    for each year of successful service in one or more of those 16    capacities, up to a maximum of 5 points. Certified 17    Firefighter III and State of Illinois or nationally 18    licensed paramedics shall be awarded one point per year up 19    to a maximum of 5 points. Applicants from outside the 20    municipality who were employed as full-time firefighters 21    or firefighter-paramedics by a fire protection district or 22    another municipality for at least 2 years shall be awarded 23    5 experience preference points. These additional points 24    presuppose a rating scale totaling 100 points available 25    for the eligibility list. If more or fewer points are used 26    in the rating scale for the eligibility list, the points   HB4935- 35 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    awarded under this subsection shall be increased or 2    decreased by a factor equal to the total possible points 3    available for the examination divided by 100.4        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 5    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 6    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 7    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 8    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 9    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 10    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 11    receive the full amount of preference points under this 12    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 13    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 14    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 15    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 16    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 17    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 18    based on the totals received if all points under this 19    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 20    list shall be determined by lot. 21        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 22    residence is located within the fire department's 23    jurisdiction shall be preferred for appointment to and 24    employment with the fire department.25        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 26    preference points may be awarded for unique categories   HB4935- 36 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    based on an applicant's experience or background as 2    identified by the commission.3        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 4    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 5    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 6    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 7    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 8    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 9    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 10    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 11    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 12    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 13    10-2.1-4 of this Division and the terms established by a 14    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 15    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 16    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 17    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 18    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 19    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 20    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 21    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 22    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 23    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 24    components of the examination. 25        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission may give 26    preference for original appointment to persons designated   HB4935- 37 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 2    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 3    commission may give preference for original appointment to 4    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 5    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 6    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 7    commission shall determine the number of preference points 8    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 9    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 10    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 11    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 12    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 13    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 14    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 15    preference for original appointment to persons designated 16    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 17    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 18    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 19    applied by the commission in determining the final 20    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 21    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 22    total number of preference points awarded under this 23    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 24    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 25    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 26    addition to other preference points awarded by the   HB4935- 38 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    commission. 2    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 3claim the credit before any examination held under the 4provisions of this Section, but the preference may be given 5after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 6list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 7credit before any certification or appointments are made from 8the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 9evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 10who are eligible for preference credit may make a claim in 11writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 12eligibility list, or the claim may be deemed waived. Final 13eligibility registers may be established after the awarding of 14verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 15credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 16eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 17upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 18the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 19eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 20employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 21background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 22history, employment history, moral character, oral 23examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 24on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 25examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 26after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.  HB4935- 39 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 2age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 3shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 4abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 5of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 6shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 7provided in this Section.8    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 9for original appointment after the names have been on the list 10for more than 2 years.11    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 12fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 13not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 14convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 15However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 16the fire department because of the person's record of 17misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1811-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1912-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 2031-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 21(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 22Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 23for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 24is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 25violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 26provided.  HB4935- 40 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 2is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 3fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 4furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 5Bureau of Investigation by the commission.6    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 7consider some aspect of criminal history record information 8for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 9responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 10conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 11Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 12Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 13pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 14in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.15    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 16of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 17prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 18commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 19only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 20of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 21appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 22any calendar year.23    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 24questions or answers before a written examination, or 25otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 26this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be   HB4935- 41 -LRB104 14847 RTM 27991 b1subject to charges for official misconduct.2    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 3in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 4examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 5was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 6disciplinary actions.7(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 8102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 95-13-22.)